Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-164
Insurer; transfer of domicile; rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 44-161 to 44-163.

Laws 1989, LB 61, § 4.